New York, session 2025-2026, A10945.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 58 of the civil 2 service law, including the age requirements under paragraph (a) of 3 subdivision 1 of such section, or any other provision of law to the 4 contrary, Jonathan Myers, who has been continuously employed by the 5 village of Chatham, in the county of Columbia, as a part-time police 6 officer, shall be eligible to take the competitive civil service exam- 7 ination for the position of police officer and shall, contingent upon 8 his score on such examination, be eligible to be placed on the eligible 9 list for appointment as a civil service police officer with the village 10 of Chatham police department. 11 § 2. Jonathan Myers shall otherwise be subject to the merit and 12 fitness provisions of the civil service law applicable to civil service 13 police officers. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15518-02-6